Utah statutes.
13-32-105.   Violations.
(1)  It is a violation of this chapter for any vendor, required to maintain
receipts or records under Section 13-32-104, to knowingly:
(a)  falsify, obliterate, or destroy the receipts or records;
(b)  refuse or fail to make such receipts available for inspection, upon the
request of a law enforcement officer, within a reasonable period of time under
the circumstances surrounding the request; or
(c)  present credentials pursuant to the requirements of this chapter which
are false, fraudulent, forged, or fraudulently obtained.
(2)  Nothing contained within this section shall be construed to require a
vendor to possess the receipts or records required by Section 13-32-104 on or
about the vendor's person without reasonable notice.
